Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 7. Winding up of Company Business

§ 4101.
Events causing dissolution and winding up of company business.

A limited liability company is dissolved, and its business shall be wound up, upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

an event or circumstance that the operating agreement states causes dissolution;

consent of the number or percentage of members specified in the operating agreement, or in the absence of a provision governing approval of a dissolution or winding up of the company contained in an operating agreement, the consent of all the members;

the passage of 90 consecutive days during which the company has no members;

on application by a member, the entry by the Superior Court of an order dissolving the company on the grounds that:

the conduct of all or substantially all of the company’s activities is unlawful; or

it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the company’s activities in conformance with the certificate of organization and the operating agreement; or

on application by a member, the entry by the Superior Court of an order dissolving the company on the grounds that the managers or those members in control of the company:

have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal or fraudulent; or

have acted or are acting in a manner that is oppressive and was, is, or will be directly harmful to the applicant.

In an action brought under subdivision (a)(5) of this section, the Court may order a remedy other than dissolution.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4102.
Limited liability company continues after dissolution.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a limited liability company continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up its business.

At any time after the dissolution of a limited liability company and before the winding up of its business is completed, all of the members, or, if different, the number or percentage of members specified in the operating agreement to dissolve or liquidate the company may waive the right to have the company’s business wound up and the company terminated, in which case:

the limited liability company resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred and any liability incurred by the company or a member after the dissolution and before the waiver is determined shall be subject to the same limitations on liability as if the dissolution had never occurred; and

the rights of a third party accruing under section 4104 of this title or arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or received a notification of the waiver are not adversely affected.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4103.
Right to wind up limited liability company’s business.

After dissolution, a member may participate in winding up a limited liability company’s business, but on application of any member, member’s legal representative, or transferee, the Superior Court, for good cause shown, may order judicial supervision of the winding up.

In winding up its activities, a limited liability company:

shall discharge the company’s debts, obligations, or other liabilities, settle and close the company’s activities, and marshal and distribute the assets of the company; and

may:

deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of dissolution stating the name of the company and that the company is dissolved;

preserve the company activities and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

transfer the company’s property;

settle disputes by mediation or arbitration; and

perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

If a dissolved limited liability company has no members, the legal representative of the last person to have been a member may wind up the activities of the company. If the person does so, the person has the powers of a sole manager under subsection 4054(c) of this title and is deemed to be a manager for the purposes of subdivision 4042(a)(2) of this title.

If the legal representative under subsection (c) of this section declines or fails to wind up the company’s activities, a person may be appointed to do so by the consent of transferees who own a majority of the rights to receive distributions as transferees at the time the consent is to be effective.
(d) (1) If the legal representative under subsection (c) of this section declines or fails to wind up the company’s activities, a person may be appointed to do so by the consent of transferees who own a majority of the rights to receive distributions as transferees at the time the consent is to be effective.

A person appointed under this subsection:

has the powers of a sole manager under subsection 4054(c) of this title and is deemed to be a manager for purposes of subdivision 4042(a)(2) of this title; and

shall promptly deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment to the company’s certificate of organization to:

state that the company has no members;

state that the person has been appointed pursuant to this subsection (d) to wind up the company; and

provide the street and mailing addresses of the person.

The Superior Court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a dissolved limited liability company, including the appointment of a person to wind up the company’s activities:

on application of a member, if the applicant establishes good cause;

on the application of a transferee, if:

the company does not have any members;

the legal representative of the last person to have been a member declines or fails to wind up the company’s activities; and

within a reasonable time following the dissolution, a person has not been appointed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; or

in connection with a proceeding under subdivision 4101(a)(4) or (5) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4104.
Member’s or manager’s power and liability as agent after dissolution.

A limited liability company is bound by a member’s or manager’s act after dissolution that:

is appropriate for winding up the company’s business; or

would have bound the company under section 4041 of this title before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4105.
Articles of termination.

At any time after dissolution and winding up, a limited liability company may terminate its existence by filing with the Secretary of State articles of termination stating:

the name of the company;

the date of the dissolution; and

that the company’s business has been wound up and the legal existence of the company has been terminated.

The existence of a limited liability company is terminated upon the filing of the articles of termination, or upon a later effective date, if specified in the articles of termination.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4106.
Distribution of assets in winding up limited liability company’s business.

In winding up a limited liability company’s business, the assets of the company shall be applied to discharge its obligations to creditors, including members who are creditors. Any surplus shall be applied to pay in money the net amount distributable to members in accordance with their right to distributions under subsection (b) of this section.

Each member is entitled to a distribution upon the winding up of the limited liability company’s business consisting of a return of all contributions which have not previously been returned and a distribution of any remainder in proportion to each member’s capital contributions.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4107.
Known claims against dissolved limited liability company.

A dissolved limited liability company may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

A dissolved limited liability company shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution. The notice shall:

specify the information required to be included in a claim;

provide a mailing address where the claim is to be sent;

state the deadline for receipt of the claim, which may not be less than 120 days after the date the written notice is received by the claimant; and

state that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against a dissolved limited liability company is barred if the requirements of subsection (b) of this section are met, and:

the claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

in the case of a claim that is timely received but rejected by the company:

the company causes the claimant to receive notice in a record stating that the claim is rejected and will be barred unless the claimant commences an action against the company to enforce the claim within 90 days after the claimant receives the notice; and

the claimant does not commence the required action within the 90 days.

This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or a liability that on that date is contingent.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4108.
Other claims against dissolved limited liability company.

A dissolved limited liability company may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the company to present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the dissolved limited liability company’s principal office is located or, if it has none in this State, in the county in which its designated office is or was last located, and sent to the Office of the Attorney General;

describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim is to be sent; and

state that a claim against the limited liability company is barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within five years after publication of the notice.

If the dissolved limited liability company sends notice to the Attorney General and publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, a cause of action against a dissolved limited liability company, whether arising before or after the dissolution of the limited liability company, may be enforced only as follows:
(c) (1) If the dissolved limited liability company sends notice to the Attorney General and publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, a cause of action against a dissolved limited liability company, whether arising before or after the dissolution of the limited liability company, may be enforced only as follows:

against the dissolved limited liability company; and

if any of the assets of the dissolved limited liability company have been distributed to its members, against members of the dissolved limited liability company.

A cause of action against a dissolved limited liability company arising under subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection is extinguished unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the cause of action against the dissolved limited liability company prior to the expiration of the statute of limitations applicable to the cause of action.

A cause of action against a dissolved limited liability company arising under subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection is extinguished unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the cause of action against a member of a dissolved limited liability company prior to the earlier of the following:

the expiration of the statute of limitations applicable to the cause of action; or

five years after the effective date of the dissolution of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4109.
Enforcement of claims against dissolved limited liability company.

A claim not barred under section 4108 of this title may be enforced against the dissolved limited liability company:

to the extent of its undistributed assets, including any insurance assets held by the limited liability company that may be available to satisfy claims; or

if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the dissolved company to the extent of the member’s proportionate share of the claim or the company’s assets distributed to the member in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the member.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.